California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the qualified wildfire disaster.

(B) Any taxpayer who resides within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified
 amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the qualified wildfire disaster.

(C) Any taxpayer who has a place of business within an area damaged by a qualified wildfire disaster who paid or incurred expenses, and received qualified amounts from a settlement entity, arising out of or pursuant to the
 qualified wildfire disaster.

(3) “Qualified wildfire disaster” means any disaster arising from a wildfire for which either the Governor has declared a state of emergency or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster as defined under the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.).

(4) “Settlement entity” means
 an entity making a settlement payment of a qualified amount to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board or qualified taxpayer, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board or the qualified taxpayer.

(d) The qualified taxpayer shall provide, upon request, all necessary information in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   (SB 159)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17138.8.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2031, gross income shall not include any amount received by a qualified taxpayer as a California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment” means any grant, rebate, direct assistance, or other financial assistance for wildfire mitigation, home hardening, structure hardening, vegetation management, defensible space, fuel modification activities, or community wildfire resilience received through either of the following:

(A) The California Wildfire Mitigation Financial Assistance Program under Article 16.5 (commencing with Section 8654.2) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(B) A wildfire mitigation grant program under Section 91510 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that owns the structure for which a California qualified wildfire loss mitigation payment was received.

(3) “Wildfire loss mitigation” means an activity that reduces wildfire risks to a residential structure or its contents, or both.

(c) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, as it relates to the tax exclusion provided by this section and Section 24308.10, the Legislature finds and declares the following:

(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide relief to qualifying property owners in high fire areas who participate in either of the following:

(i) The California Wildfire Mitigation Financial Assistance Program pursuant to Section 8654.2 of the Government Code.

(ii) A wildfire mitigation grant program pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 91510 of the Public Resources Code.

(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion achieves the stated goal, purpose, and objective shall be the number of
 qualified taxpayers that may be eligible to exclude qualified amounts from gross income, and the aggregate amount of funds distributed from the California Wildfire Mitigation Financial Assistance Program pursuant to Section 8654.2 of the Government Code and a wildfire mitigation grant program pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 91510 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) (A) No later than December 1, 2029, the joint powers authority created pursuant to Section 8654.4 of the Government Code shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing, to the extent data is available, the aggregate amount of funds distributed from the California Wildfire Mitigation Financial Assistance Program, and the number of individuals who accepted funds from the program who may be eligible to exclude the income pursuant to this section and Section 24308.10.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may provide data related to amounts excluded from gross income pursuant to this section and Section 24308.10, requested by the joint powers authority, to the extent that data is available. Taxpayer information received by the joint powers authority pursuant to this section is subject to Section 19542.

(3) No later than December 1, 2031, the Office of Emergency Services shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing, to the extent data is available, the aggregate amount of funds distributed from a wildfire mitigation grant program pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 91510 of the Public Resources Code and the number of individuals or entities who accepted funds from
 the program who may be eligible to exclude the income pursuant to this section and Section 24308.10.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   (SB 195)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2031, by its own provisions)
-------------------------------------------

17139.2.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2028, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer
 that owned real property located in the County of Sonoma during the 2019 Kincade Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Sonoma during the 2019 Kincade Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(C) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Sonoma during the 2019 Kincade Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the Kincade Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41 in regards to the exclusion provided by this section and Section 24309.6, the Legislature finds and declares that the specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide essential relief to individuals who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from the devastating 2019 Kincade Fire.

(2) (A) On December 1, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall deliver to the Legislature a written report that includes both of the following:

(i) To the extent feasible, the estimated number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, as those terms are used in this section and Section 24309.6, as a result of the exclusion.

(ii) The estimated aggregate amount of those settlement payments arising out of the 2019 Kincade Fire.

(B) The report required by this paragraph shall be delivered to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 5.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17139.3.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2028, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following:

(A) Any taxpayer
 that owned real property located in the County of Shasta or the County of Tehama during the 2020 Zogg Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(B) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Shasta or the County of Tehama during the 2020 Zogg Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(C) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Shasta or the County of Tehama during the 2020 Zogg Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of or pursuant to the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(3) “Settlement entity” means Pacific Gas and Electric Company or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer.

(c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41 in regards to the exclusion provided by this section and Section 24309.7, the Legislature finds and declares that the specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide essential relief to individuals who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from
 the devastating 2020 Zogg Fire.

(2) (A) On December 1, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall deliver to the Legislature a written report that includes both of the following:

(i) To the extent feasible, the estimated number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, as those terms are used in this section and Section 24309.7, as a result of the exclusion.

(ii) The estimated aggregate amount of those settlement payments arising out of the 2020 Zogg Fire.

(B) The report required by this paragraph shall be delivered to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 6.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17139.5.

For taxpayers who were not allowed to deduct the vehicle smog impact fee imposed by Section 6262 when paid or incurred, any interest paid by this state in conjunction with the refund of the smog impact fee shall be excluded from gross income.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 31, Sec. 2.   Effective June 8, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17139.6.

Section 139A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to federal subsidies for prescription drug plans, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 12.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17140.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings as provided in the Golden State Scholarshare Trust Act (Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code):

(1) “Beneficiary” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(2) “Benefit” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(3) “Participant” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(4) “Participation agreement” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(5) “Scholarshare trust” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 69980 of the Education Code.

(b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), gross income of a beneficiary or a participant does not include any of the following:

(1) Any distribution or earnings under a Scholarshare trust participation agreement, as provided in Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code.

(2) Any contribution to the Scholarshare trust on behalf of a beneficiary shall not be includable as gross income of that beneficiary.

(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2002:

(1) Any distribution under a Scholarshare trust participation agreement shall be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 17085, to the extent not excluded from gross income under this part. For purposes of applying Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code, the following apply:

(A) All Scholarshare trust accounts of which an individual is a beneficiary shall be treated as one account,
 except as otherwise provided.

(B) All distributions during a taxable year shall be treated as one distribution.

(C) The value of the participation agreement, income on the participation agreement, and investment in the participation agreement shall be computed as of the close of the calendar year in which the taxable year begins.

(2) A contribution by a for-profit or nonprofit entity, or by a state or local government agency, for the benefit of an owner or employee of that entity or a beneficiary whom the owner or employee has the power to designate, including the owner or employee’s minor children, shall be included in the gross income of that owner or employee in the year the contribution is made.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “distribution” includes any benefit furnished to a beneficiary under a participation agreement, as provided in Article 19 (commencing with Section 69980) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of the Education Code.

(4) (A) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to that portion of any distribution that, within 60 days of distribution, is transferred to the credit of another beneficiary under the Scholarshare trust who is a “member of the family,” as that term is used in Section 529(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 211 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), of the former beneficiary of that Scholarshare trust.

(B) Any change in the beneficiary of an
 interest in the Scholarshare trust shall not be treated as a distribution for purposes of paragraph (1) if the new beneficiary is a “member of the family,” as that term is used in Section 529(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 211 of the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997 (Public Law 105-34), of the former beneficiary of that Scholarshare trust.

(d) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, Sections 529(c) and 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of designated beneficiaries and contributors and to other definitions and special rules, respectively, shall apply, except as otherwise provided in Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and this part.

(e) (1) The amendments made by Section 302(a)(1) of
 Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to other definitions and special rules, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 302(b)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The amendments made by Section 302(c)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for contributions of refunded amounts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(f) (1) The amendments made by Section 11025(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to change in beneficiaries or programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of designated beneficiaries and contributors, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided.

(B) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to qualified higher education expenses, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided.

(C) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), that would be treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified higher education expense” under Section 529(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding anything in Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Any
 distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under subparagraph (C) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(g) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the amendments made by Section 302(a) of Division O of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2020 (Public Law 116-94) to Section 529(c)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions for certain expenses associated with registered apprenticeship programs, shall apply.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the amendments made by Section 302(b)(1) of Division O of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2020 (Public Law 116-94)
 to Section 529(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions for qualified education loan repayments, shall apply.

(h) (1) Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rollovers to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, shall not apply.

(2) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the special rollover to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified rollover contribution” under Section 408A(e)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding Section 529 or Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the
 gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Any distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under paragraph (2) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 19.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17140.3.

Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified state tuition programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 529(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”

(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “Section 511.”

(b) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury
 under Section 529(d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(c) (1) The amendments made by Section 302(a)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to other definitions and special rules, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 302(b)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The amendments made by
 Section 302(c)(1) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529(c)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for contributions of refunded amounts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 11025(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to change in beneficiaries or programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of designated beneficiaries and contributors, shall not apply,
 except as otherwise provided.

(B) The amendments made by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified higher education expenses, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided.

(C) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 11032(a)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), that would be treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified higher education expense” under Section 529(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 11032(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding anything in Section
 529 of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Any distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under subparagraph (C) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(e) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the amendments made by Section 302(a) of Division O of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2020 (Public Law 116-94) to Section 529(c)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions for certain expenses associated with registered apprenticeship programs, shall apply.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, the amendments made by Section 302(b)(1) of Division O of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2020 (Public Law 116-94) to Section 529(c)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions for qualified education loan repayments, shall apply.

(f) (1) Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rollovers to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, shall not apply. 

(2) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the special rollover to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, treated for federal income tax purposes
 as a “qualified rollover contribution” under Section 408A(e)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding Section 529 or Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code. 

(3) Any distribution includable in the gross income of a distributee under paragraph (2) shall not affect the exempt status of the qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 20.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17140.4.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, added by Section 102 of Division B of Public Law 113-295, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 529A(a) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) By substituting the phrase “under this part and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)” in lieu of the phrase “under this subtitle.”

(2) By substituting “Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731)” in lieu of “Section 511.”

(b) Section 529A(c)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is
 modified by substituting “2.5 percent” in lieu of “10 percent.”

(c) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 529A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports, shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(d) (1) The amendments made by Section 303(a) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 529A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The amendments made by Section 303(b) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(3) and 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE
 programs shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(3) The amendments made by Section 303(c) of Division Q of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Sections 529A(d)(4) and 529A(c)(1)(C)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE program, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(e) The amendments made by Section 11024(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to Section 529A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(f) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 (Public Law 117-328) to Section 529A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified ABLE programs,
 shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) (A) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, as it relates to the tax expenditures established by this subdivision and subdivision (f) of Section 23711.4 (hereafter the “tax expenditures,”) the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(i) The goal, purpose, and objective of the tax expenditures are to encourage and assist individuals and families to save private funds for purposes of supporting persons with disabilities to maintain their health, independent, and quality of life.

(ii) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the tax expenditures are achieving their stated goal shall be the number of ABLE accounts that are created for individuals who are made newly eligible by the raised age limit.

(B) No later than January 1, 2030, the Treasurer’s office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of ABLE accounts that are created for individuals who are made newly eligible by the raised age limit.

(g) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amendments made by Section 70204(a)(2) of Public Law 119-21 to Sections 529A(b)(2)(B), relating to cash contributions, and 529A(b)(6), relating to prohibition on excess contributions, of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 3.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17140.5.

(a) Pursuant to Section 206 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appen. Sec. 526), the period of a servicemember’s military service may not be included in computing any period limited by law, regulation, or order for the bringing of any action or proceeding under this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), by or against the servicemember or the servicemember’s heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns.

(b) Section 19521 is modified to provide that, pursuant to Section 207 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appen. Sec. 527), the maximum rate of interest on any underpayment incurred by a servicemember, or the servicemember and the servicemember’s spouse jointly, before the servicemember enters military service may not bear interest at a rate in excess of 6 percent per year during the period of military service.

(c) Pursuant to Section 511 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appen. Sec. 571):

(1) A servicemember not domiciled in this state does not become a resident of this state by reason of being present in this state solely in compliance with military orders.

(2) Compensation for military service of a servicemember not domiciled in this state is not income for services
 performed or from sources within this state.

(3) The military compensation of a servicemember not domiciled in this state may not be used to increase the tax liability imposed on other income of that servicemember or that servicemember’s spouse.

(4) A Native American servicemember whose legal residence or domicile is a federal Indian reservation shall be treated as living on the federal Indian reservation and the compensation of that servicemember for military service shall be deemed to be income derived wholly from federal Indian reservation sources.

(d) For purposes of this part and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), in the case of a servicemember not domiciled in this state, all of the following shall apply:

(1) Compensation for military
 service shall not be included in any of the following:

(A) Gross income of that servicemember or the spouse of that servicemember.

(B) “Entire taxable income” for purposes of computing the tax imposed under subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 17041.

(C) “Alternative minimum taxable income” for purposes of computing tax imposed under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 17062.

(2) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5 is modified to provide that references to “adjusted gross income” for purposes of computing limitations based upon adjusted gross income, shall mean the amount required to be shown as adjusted gross income on the federal tax return for the same taxable year reduced by the amount of the compensation for
 military service for that taxable year of a servicemember not domiciled in this state.

(e) (1) “Federal Indian reservation,” “servicemember,” “military service,” “period of military service,” and “compensation for military service” shall have the same meanings as applicable for purposes of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appen. Sec. 501 et seq.).

(2) “Native American” has the same meaning as the term “Indian” for purposes of applying Section 511(e) of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appen. Sec. 571(e)) for federal purposes.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any taxable year for which the period for making assessments or allowing a claim for refund or credit has not expired as of December 19,
 2003.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 388, Sec. 2.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17141.

Gross income does not include income derived from an obligation of a Community Energy Authority established under the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 52000) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 140.   Effective July 28, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1985, pursuant to Sec. 220 of Ch. 498.)
-------------------------------------------

17141.1.

Gross income does not include any amounts received as a premium assistance subsidy under Title 25 (commencing with Section 100800) of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 38, Sec. 36.   (SB 78)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17141.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or guidance, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, gross income does not include either of the following:

(1) Any funds deposited, any investment returns accrued, and any accrued interest in a trust account under the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act (Chapter 16.1 (commencing with Section 18997.5) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(2) Any funds from the trust account described in paragraph (1) that is withdrawn or transferred by an eligible youth.

(b) Notwithstanding any
 other law or guidance, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, funds deposited, any investment returns accrued, and any accrued interest in a trust account under the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act (Chapter 16.1 (commencing with Section 18997.5) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and any funds from a trust account that is withdrawn or transferred by an eligible youth shall not be considered earned income for purposes of eligibility for the California Earned Income Tax Credit pursuant to Section 17052 and the Young Child Tax Credit pursuant to Section 17052.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 54.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17142.

Sections 111(b) and 111(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credits and treatment of credit carryovers, shall be applicable with respect to credits allowable under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1465, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1988.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1988, by Sec. 77 of Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

17142.5.

(a) For purposes of the following provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, a qualified hazardous duty area shall be treated in the same manner as if it were a combat zone (as determined under Section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code):

(1) Section 2 (a)(3) (relating to a special rule where a deceased spouse was in missing status).

(2) Section 112 (relating to certain combat zone compensation of members of
 the Armed Forces).

(3) Section 692 (relating to income taxes of members of Armed Forces upon death).

(4) Section 7508 (relating to time for performing certain acts postponed by reason of service in combat zone).

(b) “Qualified hazardous duty area” means Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, or Macedonia, if, as of March 20, 1996, any member of the Armed Forces of the United States is entitled to special pay under Section 310 of Title 37 of the United States Code (relating to special pay; duty subject to hostile fire or imminent danger) for services performed in that country. “Qualified hazardous duty area” includes any country only during the period that entitlement is in effect. Solely for purposes of applying Section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code, in the case of an individual who is performing services as part of
 Operation Joint Endeavor outside the United States while deployed away from the individual’s permanent duty station, the term “qualified hazardous duty area” includes, during the period for which that entitlement is in effect, any area in which those services are performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 24.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17143.

Sections 103 and 141 to 150, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to interest on governmental obligations, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 25.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17144.

(a) Section 108(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general business credit, is modified by substituting “this part” in lieu of “Section 38 (relating to general business credit).”

(b) Section 108(b)(2)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to foreign tax credit carryovers, shall not apply.

(c) Section 108(b)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit carryover reduction, is modified by substituting “11.1 cents” in lieu of “3313 cents” in each place in which it appears. In the case where more than one credit is allowable under this part, the credits shall be reduced on a pro rata basis.

(d) Section 108(g)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjusted tax attributes, is modified by substituting “($9)” in lieu of “($3).”

(e) (1) If a taxpayer makes an election for federal income tax purposes under Section 108(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of discharge of qualified real property business indebtedness, a separate election shall not be allowed
 under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer has not made an election for federal income tax purposes under Section 108(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of discharge of qualified real property business indebtedness, then the taxpayer shall not be allowed to make that election for purposes of this part.

(f) Section 108(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deferral and ratable inclusion of income arising from business indebtedness discharged by the reacquisition of a debt instrument, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 10.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17144.5.

(a) (1) Section 108(a)(1)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that the amount excluded from gross income shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) (two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in the case of a married individual filing a separate return).

(2) Section 108(a)(1)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “before January 1, 2015,” in lieu of clauses (i) and (ii).

(b) Section 108(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “(within the meaning of section 163(h)(3)(B), applied by substituting ‘$800,000